North Dakota, session 69, SB2226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-61-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The commission on legal counsel for indigents is established for the purpose of developing
and monitoring a process for the delivery of state-funded legal counsel services for indigents
which are required under the Constitution of North Dakota and the United States Constitution
and any applicable statute or court rule. The commission shall provide indigent defense
services for indigent individuals determined by the court to be eligible for and in need of those
services pursuant to the standards and policies of the commission governing eligibility for such
services. For purposes of establishing release conditions at an initial appearance, an
incarcerated individual is presumed indigent.
SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - COMMISSION ON LEGAL COUNSEL FOR INDIGENTS -
LEGAL COUNSEL SERVICES AT INITIAL APPEARANCES. There is appropriated out of any moneys
in the general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $463,644 or so much of
the sum as may be necessary, to the commission on legal counsel for indigents for the purpose of
providing legal counsel services for incarcerated individuals at initial appearances, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this Act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.

S. B. NO. 2226 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2226.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 4 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State